Virginia statutes. Title 42.1. Libraries.
Chapter 4. Law Libraries.

§ 42.1-60.
State Law Library managed by Supreme Court.

There shall be a State Law Library at Richmond maintained as at present, which shall be managed by the Supreme Court. The Court shall appoint the librarian and other employees to hold office at the pleasure of the Court.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-13; 1970, c. 606; 1977, c. 397; 2022, c. 355.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 rewrote the section, which read: “There shall be a State Law Library at Richmond, with a branch thereof at Staunton, maintained as at present, which shall be managed by the Supreme Court. The Court shall appoint the librarian and other employees to hold office during the pleasure of the Court; provided, however, that the clerk at Staunton shall act as law librarian there without additional compensation therefor.”

§ 42.1-61.
Books, etc., constituting State Law Library.

The State Law Library shall consist of the books, periodicals, audiovisual materials, and other media now in the law library at Richmond, with such additions as may be made thereto.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-14; 1970, c. 606; 2022, c. 355.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 rewrote the section, which read: “The State Law Library shall consist of the books now in the law libraries at Richmond and Staunton, with such additions as may be made thereto.”

§ 42.1-62.
Additions to Library.

The Supreme Court shall, from time to time, make additions to the State Law Library by purchases, and may lease or purchase computer terminals for the purpose of retrieving available legal reference data, with funds at its disposal for these purposes, and may cause books to be transferred from one law library to another. All law books acquired by the Commonwealth by gift, or by exchange, from the United States, or other states and countries, shall be placed in the Library.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-15; 1970, c. 606; 1977, c. 397; 2011, c. 537.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 537 deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The Director of the Department of Purchases and Supply shall have placed in the State Law Library at Richmond, and in the branch thereof at Staunton, a copy of every law book required by §§

17.1-319

and 30-34.5.”

§ 42.1-63.
Regulation of State Law Library.

The Supreme Court shall have the power to make and enforce such rules and orders for the regulation of the State Law Library, and the use thereof, as it determines is appropriate.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-16; 1970, c. 606; 1977, c. 397; 1989, c. 704; 2022, c. 355.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 substituted “as it determines is appropriate” for “as may to it seem proper” in the first sentence; and deleted the former second and third sentences, which read: “Such rules and orders may provide for the assessment and collection of fees for the use of computer research services other than for valid state uses, which shall include official use by attorneys for the Commonwealth and public defenders, and their assistants. Such fees shall be assessed in the amount necessary to cover the expenses of such services and those collected and hereby appropriated to the Court to be paid as part of the cost of maintaining such computer research capabilities.”

§ 42.1-64.
Who may use Library.

The Governor and other state officers at the seat of government, the Reporter of the Supreme Court, members of the General Assembly and an individual designated by a member of the General Assembly to perform legal research, judges of courts, and practicing attorneys in good standing, and such other persons as the Supreme Court shall designate, shall have the use of the State Law Library, under such rules and regulations as the Court shall make.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-17; 1970, c. 606; 1977, c. 397; 2009, c. 584.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 584 inserted “and an individual designated by a member of the General Assembly to perform legal research.”

§ 42.1-65.
Local law libraries in charge of circuit court clerks; computer research services; expenses.

If the members of the bar practicing in any county or city of the Commonwealth shall procure by voluntary contribution a law library with a value of at least $500 for the use of the courts held in such county or city, and of the bar practicing therein, it shall be the duty of the circuit court of such county or city to require its clerk to take charge of the law library so contributed and to keep the law library in the courthouse or clerk’s office building according to the rules prescribed by the bar and approved by the court. In addition, all or a portion of such law library may be housed in the local public library with the approval of and subject to the management and control of the local public library.

If the members of the bars practicing in two or more adjoining counties or cities of the Commonwealth shall jointly procure by voluntary contribution a law library with a value of at least $500 for the joint use of the courts held in such counties and cities, and of the bars practicing therein, it shall be the joint duty of the circuit courts of such counties and cities to require one of its clerks to take charge of the law library so contributed and to keep the law library in the most convenient courthouse or clerk’s office building according to the rules jointly prescribed by the bars and jointly approved by the courts.

Such local and regional law libraries may purchase or lease computer terminals for the purpose of retrieving available legal reference data, and if so, the library rules shall provide for the assessment and collection of fees, which may include use of a flat rate or fee structure, for the use of computer research services other than for official use of the courts, attorneys for the Commonwealth and public defenders and their assistants, and counties and cities serviced by such libraries, which fees shall be sufficient to cover the expenses of such services.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-18; 1962, c. 515; 1970, c. 606; 1977, c. 397; 1989, c. 704; 2009, c. 617; 2022, c. 355.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 617 added the last sentence in subsection A; inserted “which may include use of a flat rate or fee structure” in subsection C; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in subsections A and B, substituted “with a value of at least $500” for “of the value of $500, at the least,” “to take charge of the law library” for “to take charge of the library,” and “to keep the law library” for “to keep the same”; deleted the former last sentence in subsection C, which read: “Such libraries, pursuant to rules of the Supreme Court and at costs to such libraries, may have access to computer research services of the State Law Library”; and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Circuit court law libraries. —

A clerk of court may enter into private subscription agreements: (1) where local bar rules provide such authority, and the court permits the clerk to do so; (2) where the local governing body has authorized it; or (3) pursuant to the statutory authority vested in the clerk to purchase such services. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jack Kennedy, Clerk of the Circuit Court for Wise County and City of Norton, 10-036, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (5/6/10).

Metal detector screenings and door locks do not necessarily negate the requirement that a library be open to the public. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jack Kennedy, Clerk of the Circuit Court for Wise County and City of Norton, 10-036, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (5/6/10).

§ 42.1-66.
Circuit courts to enforce rules for government of such libraries.

The observance of the rules so prescribed and approved may be enforced by a circuit court sitting within the area served by the particular local or regional library by such summary process and judgment as shall be provided by such rules.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-19; 1962, c. 515; 1970, c. 606; 1977, c. 397.

§§ 42.1-67 through 42.1-69.
Repealed by Acts 1977, c. 397.

Cross references.

As to assessment for law library as part of costs in civil actions and contributions from bar associations, see §

42.1-70

.

§ 42.1-70.
Assessment for law library as part of costs in civil actions; contributions from bar associations.

Any county, city, or town may, through its governing body, assess as part of the costs incident to each civil action filed in the courts located within its boundaries a sum not in excess of $4.

The imposition of such assessment shall be by ordinance of the governing body, which ordinance may provide for different sums in circuit courts and district courts, and the assessment shall be collected by the clerk of the court in which the action is filed and remitted to the treasurer of such county, city, or town and held by such treasurer subject to disbursements by the governing body for the acquisition of (i) law books, law periodicals and computer legal research services, and computer terminals for offsite placement to maximize access to the law library by the public and (ii) equipment for the establishment, use, and maintenance of a law library that shall be open for the use of the public at hours convenient to the public. In addition to the acquisition of law books, law periodicals and computer legal research services, and equipment, the disbursements may include compensation to be paid to librarians and other necessary staff for the maintenance of such library and acquisition of suitable quarters for such library. The compensation of such librarians and the necessary staff and the cost of suitable quarters for such library shall be fixed by the governing body and paid out of the fund created by the imposition of such assessment of cost. Disbursements may be made to purchase or lease computer terminals for the purpose of retaining such research services. The assessment provided for in this section shall be in addition to all other costs prescribed by law, but shall not apply to any action in which the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof or the federal government is a party and in which the costs are assessed against the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof or the federal government. The governing body is authorized to accept contributions to the fund from any bar association.

Any such library established in the County of Wythe shall be located only in a town that is the seat of the county government.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-19.4; 1964, c. 439; 1964, Ex. Sess., c. 26; 1966, c. 225; 1970, c. 606; 1972, c. 343; 1977, c. 397; 1981, c. 48; 1982, c. 607; 1983, cc. 309, 355; 1984, c. 16; 1985, c. 381; 1988, c. 571; 2009, c. 617; 2022, c. 355.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 617, in the first sentence of the next-to-last paragraph, inserted the clause (i) and (ii) designators and “computer terminals for offsite placement to maximize access to the law library by the public” in clause (i).

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in the second paragraph, inserted the second occurrence of “and” in clause (i); deleted the former fourth-to-last sentence, which read: “Such libraries, pursuant to rules of the Supreme Court and at costs to such libraries, may have access to computer research services of the State Law Library”; in the third-to-last sentence, substituted “in this section” for “herein,” inserted the second occurrence of “or any,” and inserted “the” preceding the second occurrence of “federal government”; and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Use of funds raised pursuant to statute. —

Funds raised pursuant to the statute may be used for ordinary and reasonable decorating needs incident to maintaining suitable quarters for a law library, but may not be used for improvement of hallways or elevators leading to the library. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Walter W. Stout III, Judge, Circuit Court of the City of Richmond, 01-086, 2002 Va. AG LEXIS 11 (11/28/00).

Circuit court law libraries. —

A clerk of court may enter into private subscription agreements: (1) where local bar rules provide such authority, and the court permits the clerk to do so; (2) where the local governing body has authorized it; or (3) pursuant to the statutory authority vested in the clerk to purchase such services. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jack Kennedy, Clerk of the Circuit Court for Wise County and City of Norton, 10-036, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (5/6/10).

Metal detector screenings and door locks do not necessarily negate the requirement that a library be open to the public. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jack Kennedy, Clerk of the Circuit Court for Wise County and City of Norton, 10-036, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (5/6/10).

§ 42.1-71.
Establishment of regional law libraries by governing bodies.

Any two or more adjoining counties or cities assessing costs as provided in §

42.1-70

may jointly establish a regional law library, and each such regional library shall be open to the public.

History.

1977, c. 145.